District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0855.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
Act may be cited as the “Duke District BID Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2 The Business Improvement District Act of 1996, effective May 29, 1996 (D.C.
Law 11-134; D.C. Official Code § 2-1215.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) A new section 214 is added to read as follows:
“Section 214. Duke District BID.
“(a) Subject to review and approval by the Mayor pursuant to sections 6 and 7, the
formation of the Duke Business Improvement District (“BID”), including taxable property within
the geographic area set forth in subsection (b) of this section, is authorized and the BID taxes
imposed in subsection (c) of this section shall be imposed, and become effective for the half tax
year beginning on April 1, 2027, through the earlier of the expiration of this subchapter or the
termination or dissolution of the BID.
“(b) The BID boundary shall be the geographical area encompassing the boundaries of
the lots listed below, as those lots exist as of the effective date of this section, and shall remain
fixed notwithstanding any later subdivision, consolidation, reconfiguration, or renumbering of
those lots: Square 0189, Lots 19, 55, 56, 57, 58, 59, 61, 62, 801, 803, 804, 806, 807, 808, 2001,


2002; Square 0190, Lots 74, 75, 76, 77, 78, 79, 80, 81, 82, 83, 84, 85, 86, 87, 100, 101, 102, 103,
104, 105, 119, 120, 810; Square 0202, Lots 29, 30, 31, 32, 36, 37, 38, 82, 823, 824, 832;
Square 0203, Lots 811, 812, 813, 814, 7000, 7001, 7002, 7003, 7004; Square 0204, Lots 844,
846, 847, 848, 851, 853, 7000, 7001, 7002, 7003; Square 0205, Lots 57, 58, 66, 67, 72, 74, 75,
800, 802, 812, 836, 846, 847; Square 0206, Lots 203, 236, 815, 824, 828, 829, 830, 831, 832,
7000, 7001, 7002, 7003, 7004, 7005, 7006, 7007, 7008; Square 0234, Lots 159, 163, 164, 165,
829, 836, 2007, 2008, 2011, 2012; Square 0235, Lots 61, 829, 2214, 2215; Square 0236, Lots 3,
5, 6, 7, 29, 40, 41, 42, 43, 51, 57, 58, 64, 65, 66, 67, 68, 70, 805, 807, 840, 841, 842, 2081, 2082;
Square 0237, Lots 43, 44, 45, 46, 47, 48, 181, 182, 203, 205, 206, 207, 800, 805, 823, 837, 838,
839, 840, 841, 842, 7000, 7001, 7002, 7003, 7004, 7005; Square 0238, Lots 32, 33, 34, 84, 85,
88, 89, 90, 91, 97, 103, 813, 814, 815, 817, 818, 819, 821, 849, 854, 856, 857, 860, 861, 862,
863, 873; Square 0273, Lots 29, 32, 37, 38, 39, 40, 41, 42, 43, 44, 77, 78, 79, 80, 81, 806, 807,
809; Square 0274, Lots 131, 133, 138, 139, 802, 803; Square 0304, Lots 33, 34, 824, 825; Square
0305, Lots 22, 25, 41, 42, 60, 75, 79, 2004; Square 0332, Lots 70, 71, 72, 73, 74, 75, 76, 77, 80,
81, 82, 94; Square 0333, Lots 36, 37, 807, 808, 809, 810, 828; Square 0357, Lots 46, 47, 48, 49,
50, 93, 96, 97, 98, 99, 100, 101, 102, 103, 104, 105, 106, 107, 108, 109, 110, 111, 112, 113;
Square 0358, Lots 2, 37, 47, 48, 67, 69, 70, 72, 827, 2186; Square 0359, Lots 800; Square 0360,
Lots 37, 38, 39, 40, 41, 45, 46, 47, 48, 49, 50, 51, 76, 77, 78, 79, 80, 81, 86, 87, 89, 93, 94, 98,
100, 101, 102, 103, 805; Square 0361, Lots 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 15, 16, 17, 104, 116, 117, 118,
119, 120, 121, 122, 123, 129, 130, 131, 132, 133, 134, 135, 136, 141, 820, 823, 824, 825, 834,
836, 837, 838, 839, 840, 841, 842, 843, 2005, 7000, 7001, 7002, 7003; Square 0393, Lots 16, 17,
18, 19, 20, 21, 22, 23, 24, 33, 42, 43, 47, 48, 49, 50, 51, 52, 53, 54, 801, 802, 804, 806, 825,
2017, 2018, 2026; Square 0416, Lots 24, 25, 26, 27, 30, 31, 32, 33, 34, 801, 802, 803, 804, 2003,
2004; Square 0417, Lots 56; Square 0419, Lots 32, 36, 37, 824, 846; Square 0420N, Lots 12;


Square 0440, Lots 13, 14, 24, 25, 26, 27, 800, 802, 803, 804, 807; Square 0441, Lots 67, 68, 90,
99, 819, 837, 838, 858, 859, 872, 2012, 2013, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027;
Square 0442, Lots 92, 106, 109, 111, 804, 868, 870; Square 0475, Lots 45; Square 2872, Lots
265, 266, 267, 268, 269, 270, 271, 275, 800, 803, 818, 820, 823, 824; Square 2873, Lots 261,
262, 798, 872, 873, 874, 875, 876, 877, 878, 879, 880, 881, 882, 883, 884, 885, 886, 1109, 1110,
1114, 1115, 7000, 7001, 7002, 7003, 7004, 7005, 7006, 7007, 7008, 7009, 7010, 7011; Square
2875, Lots 231, 232, 233, 234, 235, 236, 238, 239, 240, 241, 893, 1034, 1109, 1110, 2029, 2038,
2047; Square 2877, Lots 840, 879, 930, 933, 955, 966, 969, 971, 980, 983, 984, 985, 986, 987,
988, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1038, 1040; Square 2882, Lots 951, 957, 958, 959, 960, 961;
Square 3078, Lots 17, 18, 19, 26, 30, 33, 807, 810; Square 3092, Lots 15, 16, 17, 18, 40, 41, 43,
44, 45, 47, 48, 49, 802, 803, 805, 814; Square RES 0147, Lots 0; Square RES 0158, Lots 0;
Square RES 0170, Lots 0; Square RES 0272, Lots 0; Square RES 0273, Lots 0; Square RES
0274, Lots 0;
“(c)(1) The BID taxes for taxable properties in the BID shall be as follows:
“(A) The amount of $0.14 per $100 in assessed value for Class 2 Properties,
excluding hotels;
“(B) The amount of $120 per hotel or motel room annually;
“(C) The amount of $110 per unit for Class 1A or 1B Properties;
“(D) The amount of $10 per unit restricted to residents based upon income
pursuant to a federal or District affordable housing program, capped at $1,500 per building;
“(E) The amount of $0.14 per $100 in assessed value for Class 3 Properties;
“(F) The amount of $0.14 per $100 in assessed value for surface parking lots;
“(G) The amount of $100 per building or portion of a building used primarily for
religious worship or religious services, including a church, synagogue, mosque, temple, or


similar religious institution.
“(2) To the extent that a building that is subject to the BID tax is constructed
pursuant to a ground lease on land that is exempt from real property taxes, the assessed value of
the real property for purposes of the BID tax shall include the value of the building and the
leasehold interest, possessory interest, beneficial interest, or beneficial use of the land, and the
lessee or user of the land shall be assessed the corresponding BID tax, which shall be collected in
the same manner as possessory interest taxes under D.C. Official Code § 47-1005.01, or as
otherwise provided in this act.
“(3) A 5% annual increase in the BID taxes over the current tax year rates
specified in paragraph (1) is authorized subject to the requirements of section 8(b).
“(d)(1) Pursuant to section 8(a) and as provided in the BID articles of incorporation or
bylaws, the Board of Directors of the BID established by this section shall include one or more
members for each of the following:
“(A) A representative of Howard University; and
“(B) A performance venue or other cultural institution within the
geographic boundaries of the BID.
“(2) A vacancy for any Board of Directors position set forth in paragraph (1) shall
not constitute a violation of this act.
“(e) Subject to available funds, the BID shall receive matching funds from the Greater U
Street Parking Benefit Fund pursuant to section 2a(c)(4)(B) of the Performance Parking Pilot Zone
Act of 2008, effective September 14, 2011 (D.C. Law 19-21; D.C. Official Code § 50-
2531.01(c)(4)(B)), in a form and frequency to be determined by the Chief Financial Officer.”.
(b) Section 3(24)(B) (D.C. Official Code § 2-1215.02(24)(B)) is amended by Striking the
phrase “for the Mount Vernon Triangle, NoMa, Capitol Riverfront, Downtown, and Golden


Triangle BIDs,” and inserting the phrase “for the Mount Vernon Triangle, NoMa, Capitol
Riverfront, Downtown, Golden Triangle, and Duke District BIDs,” in its place.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following the approval by the Mayor (or in the event of a veto
100 by the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional
101 review as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
102 December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-2602.02(c)(1)), and publication in the
103 District of Columbia Register.